Utah statutes.
53A-13-101.5.   Teaching of American sign language.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes that American sign language is a fully developed, autonomous, natural language with distinct grammar, syntax, and art forms.

(2)  American sign language shall be accorded equal status with other linguistic systems in the state's public and higher education systems.

(3)  The State Board of Education, in consultation with the state's school districts and members of the deaf and hard of hearing community, shall develop and implement policies and procedures for the teaching of American sign language in the state's public education system at least at the middle school or high school level.

(4)  A student may count credit received for completion of a course in American sign language at the middle school or high school level towards the satisfaction of a foreign language requirement in the public education system under rules made by the State Board of Education.

(5)  The State Board of Regents, in consultation with the state's public institutions of higher education and members of the state's deaf and hard of hearing community, shall develop and implement policies and procedures for offering instruction in American sign language in the state's system of higher education consistent with the master plan for higher education under Section 53B-6-101.

(6)  The Joint Liaison Committee, in consultation with members of the state's deaf and hard of hearing community, shall review any policies and procedures developed under this section and make recommendations to either or both boards regarding the policies.

